Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-502
Racial profiling prohibited.

(1) No member of the Nebraska State Patrol or a county sheriff's office, officer of a city or village police department, or member of any other law enforcement agency in this state shall engage in racial profiling. The disparate treatment of an individual whose motor vehicle has been stopped by a law enforcement officer is inconsistent with this policy.

(2) Racial profiling shall not be used to justify the detention of an individual or to conduct a motor vehicle stop.

Laws 2001, LB 593, § 2.